District of Columbia statutes.
2-562

Penalties.

Any person who knowingly and willfully causes any document not to be published in the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, the District of Columbia Register, or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations which is required to be so published pursuant to this subchapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than $100, or imprisoned not more than 30 days, or both.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title III, § 312
as added Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 4, 25 DCR 6960
1981 Ed., § 1-1542.
1973 Ed., § 1-1539.3.